Hawaii statutes.
§668-11 Liens and incumbrances. Where
partition is made of any property which is subject as a whole to any lien or
incumbrance, the court may with the consent of the incumbrancer apportion the
incumbrance against the separate portions as partitioned to the parties, or if
the property is sold and the incumbrancer's claim is due and may be discharged
by payment the court may discharge the same out of the proceeds. Otherwise,
unless the incumbrancer consents to receive payment, the court may without
disturbing or then making any adjudication as to the incumbrance, sell, subject
to the incumbrance, the property affected thereby; or if any lien or
incumbrance is only upon the undivided share or interest of any particular
party the court may by its decree make the same a lien and charge only upon the
parcel of land partitioned to the party or a charge against the party's share
of the proceeds of sale thereof. In every case the property sold shall first
be charged with its just proportion of the costs of the partition in preference
to the lien or charge. Any party holding a lien or incumbrance and also having
other securities, may in the court's discretion be required to exhaust such
others before a distribution of the proceeds of sale in partition, or the court
may order a just deduction to be made from the amount of the lien on the
property on account of such other security. [L 1923, c 178, §11; RL 1925,
§2771; RL 1935, §4750; RL 1945, §12460; RL 1955, §337-11; HRS §668-11; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next